North Carolina, session 2025, HB465.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-7. Issuance and renewal of drivers licenses.
…
(i) Fees. – The fee for a regular drivers license is the amount set in the following table
multiplied by the number of years in the period for which the license is issued:
Class of Regular License Fee for Each Year
Class A $5.50
Class B $5.50
Class C $5.50
The fee for a motorcycle endorsement is two dollars and fifty-five cents ($2.55) for each year
of the period for which the endorsement is issued. The appropriate fee shall be paid before a
person receives a regular drivers license or an endorsement.
The fee to renew a drivers license shall be waived for any license with: (i) an active duty
military designation pursuant to subsection (q) of this section or (ii) a veteran military designation
pursuant to subsection (q1) of this section.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to licenses
renewed on or after that date.
*H465-v-1*